North Carolina statutes. Chapter 168. Persons with Disabilities.
Article 3. Family Care Homes.

§§ 168-20 through 168-22.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2020-25, s. 49(b), effective June 19, 2020.

History.

S. 168-20; 1981, c. 565, s. 1; 2005-450, s. 1; 2019-111, s. 2.6(j); 2020-3, s. 4.33(a); 2020-25, ss. 49(a), (b), 51(a), (b), (d); repealed by 2020-25, s. 49(b), effective June 19, 2020. s. 168-21; 1981, c. 565, s. 1; 1985, c. 589, s. 62; 1995, c. 535, s. 36; 2002-159, s. 24; 2005-450, s. 1; 2018-47, s. 13; 2019-111, s. 2.6(j); 2020-3, s. 4.33(a); 2020-25, ss. 49(a), (b), 51(a), (b), (d); repealed by 2020-25, s. 49(b), effective June 19, 2020. s. 168-22; 1981, c. 565, s. 1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 619, s. 1; 1999-219, s. 3.2; 2019-111, s. 2.6(j); 2020-3, s. 4.33(a); 2020-25, ss. 49(a), (b), 51(a), (b), (d); repealed by 2020-25, s. 49(b), effective June 19, 2020.

§ 168-23.
Certain private agreements void.

Any restriction, reservation, condition, exception, or covenant in any subdivision plan, deed, or other instrument of or pertaining to the transfer, sale, lease, or use of property which would permit residential use of property but prohibit the use of the property as a family care home as defined in G.S. 160D-907 is void as against public policy to the extent of the prohibition and shall be given no legal or equitable force or effect.

History.

1981, c. 565, s. 1; 2019-111, s. 2.6(j); 2020-3, s. 4.33(a); 2020-25, ss. 49(a), (c), 51(a), (b), (d).